North Dakota statutes. TITLE 10 Corporations
CHAPTER 10-19.1 North Dakota Business Corporation Act
10-19.1-10.
Articles.

The articles of incorporation must contain:

The name of the corporation.

The name of the registered agent as provided in chapter 10-01.1 and, if a noncommercial registered agent, then the address of that noncommercial registered agent in this state.

The address of the principal executive office.

The aggregate number of shares that the corporation has authority to issue.

The name and address of each incorporator.

The effective date of incorporation if a later date than that on which the certificate of incorporation is issued by the secretary of state, which may not be later than ninety days after the date on which the certificate of incorporation is issued.

The following provisions govern a corporation unless modified in the articles or in a shareholder control agreement under section 10-19.1-83:

A corporation has general business purposes as provided in section 10-19.1-08.

A corporation has perpetual existence and certain powers as provided in section 10-19.1-26.

The power to adopt, amend, or repeal the bylaws is vested in the board as provided in section 10-19.1-31.

A corporation must allow cumulative voting for directors as provided in section 10-19.1-39.

The affirmative vote of a majority of directors present is required for an action of the board as provided in section 10-19.1-46.

A written action by the board taken without a meeting must be signed by all directors as provided in section 10-19.1-47.

The board may authorize the issuance of securities and rights to purchase securities as provided in subsection 1 of section 10-19.1-61.

All shares are common shares entitled to vote and are of one class and one series as provided in subdivisions a and b of subsection 2 of section 10-19.1-61.

All shares have equal rights and preferences in all matters not otherwise provided for by the board as provided in subdivisions a and b of subsection 2 of section 10-19.1-61.

The par value of shares is fixed at one cent per share for certain purposes and may be fixed by the board for certain other purposes as provided in subdivisions a and b of subsection 2 of section 10-19.1-61.

The board may effect share dividends, divisions, and combinations under certain circumstances without shareholder approval as provided in section 10-19.1-61.1.

The board or the shareholders may issue shares for any consideration or for no consideration to effectuate share dividends or splits and determine the value of nonmonetary consideration as provided in subsection 1 of section 10-19.1-63.

Shares of a class or series may not be issued to holders of shares of another class or series to effectuate share dividends or splits, unless authorized by a majority of the voting power of the shares of the same class or series as the shares to be issued as provided in subsection 1 of section 10-19.1-63.

A corporation may issue rights to purchase securities whose terms, provisions, and conditions are fixed by the board as provided in section 10-19.1-64.

A shareholder has certain pre-emptive rights, unless otherwise provided by the board as provided in section 10-19.1-65.

Each share has one vote unless otherwise provided in the terms of the share as provided in subsection 5 of section 10-19.1-73.2.

The affirmative vote of the holders of a majority of the voting power of the shares present and entitled to vote at a duly held meeting is required for an action of the shareholders, except when this chapter requires the affirmative vote of:

A plurality of the votes cast as provided in subsection 1 of section 10-19.1-39; or

A majority of the voting power of all shares entitled to vote as provided in subsection 1 of section 10-19.1-74.

A written action of shareholders must be signed by all shareholders as provided in section 10-19.1-75.

Shares of a corporation acquired by the corporation may be reissued as provided in subsection 1 of section 10-19.1-93.

An exchange need not be approved by shareholders of the acquiring corporation unless the outstanding shares entitled to vote of that corporation will be increased by more than twenty percent immediately after the exchange as provided in subdivision c of subsection 3 of section 10-19.1-98.

An exchange need not be approved by shareholders of the acquiring corporation unless the outstanding participating shares of that corporation will be increased by more than twenty percent immediately after the exchange as provided in subdivision d of subsection 3 of section 10-19.1-98.

The following provisions govern a corporation unless modified in the articles, in a shareholder control agreement under section 10-19.1-83, or in the bylaws:

A director serves for an indefinite term that expires upon the election and qualification of a successor as provided in section 10-19.1-35.

The compensation of directors is fixed by the board as provided in section 10-19.1-37.

The method provided in section 10-19.1-41 or 10-19.1-41.1 must be used for removal of directors.

The method provided in section 10-19.1-42 must be used for filling board vacancies.

If the board fails to select a place for a board meeting, it must be held at the principal executive office as provided in subsection 1 of section 10-19.1-43.

A director may call a board meeting, and the notice of the meeting need not state the purpose of the meeting as provided in subsection 3 of section 10-19.1-43.

A majority of the board is a quorum for a board meeting as provided in section 10-19.1-45.

A committee:

Must consist of one or more individuals, who need not be directors, appointed by affirmative vote of a majority of the directors present as provided in subsection 2 of section 10-19.1-48; and

May create one or more subcommittees, each consisting of one or more members of the committees and may delegate to the subcommittee any or all of the authority of the committee as provided in subsection 7 of section 10-19.1-48.

The board may establish a special litigation committee as provided in section 10-19.1-48.

Unless the board determines otherwise, the officers have specified duties as provided in section 10-19.1-53.

Officers may delegate some or all of their duties and powers, if not prohibited by the board from doing so as provided in section 10-19.1-59.

The corporation may establish uncertificated shares as provided in subsection 6 of section 10-19.1-66.

Regular meetings of shareholders need not be held, unless demanded by a shareholder under certain conditions as provided in section 10-19.1-71.

No fewer than ten nor more than fifty days’ notice is required for a meeting of shareholders as provided in subsection 3 of section 10-19.1-73.

The board may fix a date up to fifty days before the date of a shareholders’ meeting as the date for the determination of the holders of shares entitled to notice of and entitled to vote at the meeting as provided in subsection 1 of section 10-19.1-73.2.

The number of shares required for a quorum at a shareholders’ meeting is a majority of the voting power of the shares entitled to vote at the meeting as provided in section 10-19.1-76.

Indemnification of certain persons is required as provided in section 10-19.1-91.

The board may authorize, and the corporation may make, distributions not prohibited, limited, or restricted by an agreement as provided in subsection 1 of section 10-19.1-92.

The following provisions relating to the management of the business or the regulation of the affairs of a corporation may be included either in the articles or, except for naming members of the first board fixing a greater than majority director or shareholder vote or giving or prescribing the manner of giving voting rights to persons other than shareholders otherwise than pursuant to the articles, or eliminating or limiting a director’s personal liability, in the bylaws:

The members of the first board may be named in the articles as provided in subsection 1 of section 10-19.1-32.

A manner for increasing or decreasing the number of directors as provided in section 10-19.1-33.

Additional qualifications for directors may be imposed as provided in section 10-19.1-34.

Directors may be classified as provided in section 10-19.1-38.

The day or date, time, and place of board meetings may be fixed as provided in subsection 1 of section 10-19.1-43.

Absent directors may be permitted to give written consent or opposition to a proposal as provided in section 10-19.1-44.

A larger than majority vote may be required for board action as provided in section 10-19.1-46.

A director’s personal liability to the corporation or its shareholders for monetary damages for breach of fiduciary duty as a director may be eliminated or limited in the articles as provided in section 10-19.1-50.

Authority to sign and deliver certain documents may be delegated to an officer or agent of the corporation other than the president as provided in section 10-19.1-53.

Additional officers may be designated as provided in section 10-19.1-52.

Additional powers, rights, duties, and responsibilities may be given to officers as provided in section 10-19.1-53.

A method for filling vacant offices may be specified as provided in subsection 3 of section 10-19.1-58.

A certain officer or agent may be authorized to sign share certificates as provided in subsection 1 of section 10-19.1-66.

The transfer or registration of transfer of securities may be restricted as provided in section 10-19.1-70.

The day or date, time, and place of regular shareholder meetings may be fixed as provided in subsection 3 of section 10-19.1-71.

Certain persons may be authorized to call special meetings of shareholders as provided in subsection 1 of section 10-19.1-72.

Notices of shareholder meetings may be required to contain certain information as provided in subsection 3 of section 10-19.1-73.

Voting rights may be granted in or pursuant to the articles to persons who are not shareholders as provided in subsection 6 of section 10-19.1-73.2.

A larger than majority vote may be required for shareholder action as provided in section 10-19.1-74.

Corporate actions giving rise to dissenter rights may be designated as provided in subdivision d of subsection 1 of section 10-19.1-87.

The rights and priorities of persons to receive distributions may be established as provided in section 10-19.1-92.

The articles may contain other provisions not inconsistent with section 10-19.1-32 or any other provision of law relating to the management of the business or the regulation of the affairs of the corporation.

It is not necessary to set forth in the articles any of the corporate powers granted by this chapter.

Subsection 4 does not limit:

The permissible scope of a shareholder control agreement; or

The right of the board, by resolution, to take an action that the bylaws may authorize under this section without including the authorization in the bylaws, unless the authorization is required to be included in the bylaws by another provision of this chapter.

Except for provisions included pursuant to subsection 1, any provision of the articles may:

Be made dependent upon facts ascertainable outside the articles, but only if the manner in which the facts operate upon the provision is clearly and expressly set forth in the articles; and

Incorporate by reference some or all of the terms of any agreements, contracts, or other arrangements entered into by the corporation, but only if the corporation retains at its principal executive office a copy of the agreements, contracts, or other arrangements or the portions incorporated by reference.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 147, § 3; 1993, ch. 54, §§ 4 to 6; 1995, ch. 103, § 5; 1995, ch. 104, § 1; 1997, ch. 103, § 3; 1999, ch. 50, § 9; 1999, ch. 95, § 7; 2001, ch. 112, § 2; 2005, ch. 100, § 4; 2007, ch. 99, § 12; 2007, ch. 101, § 5; 2009, ch. 106, § 7; 2011, ch. 87, § 10; 2013, ch. 89, § 5.

Derivation:

N.D.C.C. 10-19-53.

Cross-References.

Banking associations, articles of association, see N.D.C.C. § 6-02-02.

Domestic insurance companies, articles of incorporation, see N.D.C.C. § 26.1-05-06.

Collateral References.

Restrictions on sale or transfer of corporate stock, construction and application of provisions of articles providing for, 2 A.L.R.2d 745, 754.

Transfer of stock, validity of restriction on, in articles of incorporation, 61 A.L.R.2d 1318.

Construction and effect of corporate bylaws or articles relating to change in number of directors, 3 A.L.R.3d 623.

10-19.1-11.
Filing of articles of incorporation.

An original of the articles of incorporation must be filed with the secretary of state. If the secretary of state finds that the articles of incorporation conform to law and all fees are paid under section 10-19.1-147, the secretary of state shall issue a certificate of incorporation to the incorporators or the incorporators’ representative.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 147, § 3; 1991, ch. 98, § 8; 1999, ch. 50, § 10; 1999, ch. 95, § 8.

Derivation:

N.D.C.C. 10-19-54.

10-19.1-12.
Effective date of incorporation.

The corporate existence begins upon the issuance of the certificate of incorporation or at a later date as specified in the articles of incorporation. The certificate of incorporation is conclusive evidence that all conditions precedent and required to be performed by the incorporators have been performed and that the corporation has been incorporated under this chapter, except as against this state in a proceeding to cancel or revoke the certificate of incorporation or for involuntary dissolution of the corporation.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 147, § 3; 1995, ch. 104, § 2.

Derivation:

N.D.C.C. 10-19-55.

10-19.1-13.
Corporate name. [Contingent effective date – See note]

The corporate name:

Must be expressed in letters or characters used in the English language as those letters or characters appear in the American standard code for information interchange (ASCII) table.

Must contain the word “company”, “corporation”, “incorporated”, “limited”, or an abbreviation of one or more of these words.

May not contain the words “limited liability company”, “limited partnership”, “limited liability partnership”, “limited liability limited partnership”, or an abbreviation of these words.

May not contain a word or phrase indicating or implying the corporation:

Is incorporated for a purpose other than:

A lawful business purpose for which a corporation may be incorporated under this chapter; or

For a purpose stated in its articles of incorporation; or

May not be incorporated under this chapter.

Must be distinguishable in the records of the secretary of state from:

The name, whether foreign and authorized to do business in this state or domestic, unless there is filed with the articles a record that complies with subsection 3, of:

Another corporation;

A corporation incorporated or authorized to do business in this state under another chapter of this code;

A limited liability company;

A limited partnership;

A limited liability partnership; or

A limited liability limited partnership;

A name the right to which is, at the time of incorporation, reserved in the manner provided in section 10-19.1-14, 10-32.1-12, 10-33-11, 45-10.2-11, 45-13-04.2, or 45-22-05;

A fictitious name registered in the manner provided in chapter 45-11;

A trade name registered in the manner provided in chapter 47-25; or

A trademark or service mark registered in the manner provided in chapter 47-22.

The secretary of state shall determine whether a corporate name is distinguishable in the secretary of state’s records from another name for purposes of this chapter and may adopt rules reasonable or necessary for making these determinations.

If the secretary of state determines a corporate name is indistinguishable in the secretary of state’s records from another name for purposes of this chapter, the corporate name may not be used unless there is filed with the articles:

The written consent of the holder of the rights to the name to which the proposed name has been determined to be indistinguishable; or

A certified copy of a judgment of a court in this state establishing the prior right of the applicant to the use of the name in this state.

This section does not affect the right of a domestic corporation existing on July 1, 1986, or a foreign corporation authorized to do business in this state on that date to continue the use of its name.

This section and section 10-19.1-14 do not:

Abrogate or limit:

The law of unfair competition or unfair practices;

Chapter 47-25;

The laws of the United States with respect to the right to acquire and protect copyrights, trade names, trademarks, service names, and service marks; or

Any other rights to the exclusive use of names or symbols; or

Derogate the common law or the principles of equity.

A domestic or foreign corporation that is the surviving organization in a merger with one or more other organizations, or that acquires by sale, lease, or other disposition to or exchange with an organization all or substantially all of the assets of another organization including its name, may have the same name, subject to the requirements of subsection 1, as that used in this state by any of the other organizations, if the other organization whose name is sought to be used:

Was incorporated, organized, formed, or registered under the laws of this state;

Is authorized to transact business or conduct activities in this state;

Holds a reserved name in the manner provided in section 10-19.1-14, 10-32.1-12, 10-33-11, 45-10.2-11, 45-13-04.2, or 45-22-05;

Holds a fictitious name registered in the manner provided in chapter 45-11;

Holds a trade name registered in the manner provided in chapter 47-25; or

Holds a trademark or service mark registered in the manner provided in chapter 47-22.

The use of a name by a corporation in violation of this section does not affect or vitiate its corporate existence. However, a court in this state may, upon application of the state or of an interested or affected person, enjoin the corporation from doing business under a name assumed in violation of this section, although its articles may have been filed with the secretary of state and a certificate of incorporation issued.

A corporation whose period of existence has expired or is involuntarily dissolved by the secretary of state pursuant to section 10-19.1-146 or 10-19.1-146.1 may reacquire the right to use that name by refiling articles of incorporation pursuant to section 10-19.1-11, unless the name has been adopted for use or reserved by another person, in which case the filing will be rejected unless the filing is accompanied by a written consent or judgment as provided in subsection 3. A corporation that cannot reacquire the use of its corporate name shall adopt a new corporate name that complies with the provisions of this section:

By refiling articles of incorporation pursuant to section 10-19.1-11;

By amending pursuant to section 10-19.1-17; or

By reinstating pursuant to section 10-19.1-146.

Subject to section 10-19.1-133, this section applies to a foreign corporation transacting business in this state, having a certificate of authority to transact business in this state, or applying for a certificate of authority.

An amendment that only changes the name of the corporation may be authorized by a resolution approved by the board and may be submitted to and approved by the shareholders as provided in section 10-19.1-18.

A corporation that files its articles of incorporation with an effective date later than the date of filing as provided in section 10-19.1-12 shall maintain the right to the name until the effective date.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 147, § 3; 1993, ch. 54, § 7; 1995, ch. 103, § 6; 1997, ch. 103, § 4; 1999, ch. 95, § 9; 2003, ch. 85, § 3; 2005, ch. 100, § 5; 2005, ch. 384, §§ 1, 2; 2007, ch. 101, § 6; 2011, ch. 87, § 11; contingently amended by 2015, ch. 87, §§ 7, 8, effective July 1, 2015; contingently amended by 2019, ch. 93, § 2.

Derivation:

N.D.C.C. 10-19-07.

10-19.1-14.
Reserved name.

The exclusive right to the use of a corporate name otherwise permitted by section 10-19.1-13 may be reserved by any person.

The reservation must be made by filing with the secretary of state a request that the name be reserved, together with the fees provided in section 10-19.1-147:

If the name is available for use by the applicant, the secretary of state shall reserve the name for the exclusive use of the applicant for a period of twelve months.

The reservation may be renewed for successive twelve-month periods.

The right to the exclusive use of a corporate name reserved pursuant to this section may be transferred to another person by or on behalf of the applicant for whom the name was reserved by filing with the secretary of state a notice of the transfer and specifying the name and address of the transferee, together with the fees provided in section 10-19.1-147.

The right to the exclusive use of a corporate name reserved pursuant to this section may be canceled by or on behalf of the applicant for whom the name was reserved by filing with the secretary of state a notice of the cancellation, together with the fees provided in section 10-19.1-147.

The secretary of state may destroy all reserved name requests and index thereof one year after expiration.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 147, § 3; 1991, ch. 98, § 9; 1993, ch. 54, § 8; 1993, ch. 90, § 1; 1997, ch. 103, § 5; 2003, ch. 85, § 4.

Derivation:

N.D.C.C. 10-19-08.

10-19.1-15.
Registered office — Registered agent.

A corporation shall continuously maintain a registered agent in this state as provided by chapter 10-01.1, and if a noncommercial registered agent, then the address of that noncommercial registered agent in this state.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 147, § 3; 1991, ch. 98, § 10; 1993, ch. 54, § 9; 1997, ch. 103, § 6; 2007, ch. 99, § 13.

Derivation:

N.D.C.C. 10-19-09.

Cross-References.

Agent to be stated in articles, see N.D.C.C. § 10-19.1-10.

Failure to appoint agent as grounds for dissolution, see N.D.C.C. § 10-19.1-118.

10-19.1-16.
Change of registered office or registered agent — Change of name of registered agent.

As provided in chapter 10-01.1:

A corporation may change its registered office, change its registered agent, or state a change in the name of its registered agent.

A registered agent of a corporation may resign.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 147, § 3; 1991, ch. 98, § 11; 1993, ch. 54, § 10; 1993, ch. 91, § 1; 1995, ch. 103, § 7; 1997, ch. 103, § 7; 2007, ch. 99, § 14.

Derivation:

N.D.C.C. 10-19-10.

10-19.1-17.
Amendment of articles.

The articles of a corporation may be amended at any time to include or modify any provision that is required or permitted to appear in the articles or to omit any provision not required to be included in the articles, except that when articles are amended to restate them, the name and address of each incorporator and each initial director may be omitted. If only a change of address of the principal executive office is required, an amendment need not be filed; however, the change of address of the principal executive office must then be reported on the annual report filed after the change or be submitted in writing to the secretary of state without a filing fee. Unless otherwise provided in this chapter, the articles may be amended or modified only in accordance with sections 10-19.1-18, 10-19.1-19, and 10-19.1-20.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 147, § 3; 2013, ch. 89, § 6; 2015, ch. 86, § 10, effective August 1, 2015.

Derivation:

N.D.C.C. 10-19-58.

Collateral References.

Reduction of capital stock and distribution of capital assets upon reduction, 35 A.L.R.2d 1149.

Construction and effect of corporate bylaws or articles relating to change in number of directors, 3 A.L.R.3d 623.

10-19.1-18.
Procedure for amendment when no shares are outstanding.

Before the issuance of shares by a corporation, the articles also may be amended pursuant to section 10-19.1-30 by the incorporators or by the board. The articles may be amended by the board to change or cancel a statement pursuant to subsection 4 of section 10-19.1-61, establishing or fixing the rights and preferences of a class or series of shares before the issuance of any shares of that class or series or at any subsequent time that no shares of that class or series are outstanding by filing articles of amendment or a statement of cancellation, as appropriate, with the secretary of state. If a statement filed pursuant to subsection 4 of section 10-19.1-61 is canceled, the shares of the class and series originally covered by the statement have the status of authorized but unissued, undesignated shares, unless the articles otherwise provide. If the articles provide that the canceled shares may not be reissued, the statement of cancellation must include the information specified in subsection 2 of section 10-19.1-93.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 147, § 3; 1993, ch. 54, § 11; 1995, ch. 103, § 8.

10-19.1-19.
Procedure for amendment after issuance of shares.

Except as otherwise provided in section 10-19.1-18, after the issuance of shares by the corporation, the articles may be amended in the manner set forth in this section.

A resolution approved by the affirmative vote of a majority of the directors present, or proposed by a shareholder or shareholders holding five percent or more of the voting power of the shares entitled to vote, that sets forth the proposed amendment must be submitted to a vote at the next regular or special meeting of the shareholders of which notice has not yet been given but still can be timely given. Any number of amendments may be submitted to the shareholders and voted upon at one meeting, but the same or substantially the same amendment proposed by a shareholder or shareholders need not be submitted to the shareholders or be voted upon at more than one meeting during a fifteen-month period, except that if a corporation is registered or reporting under the federal securities laws, the provisions of this sentence do not apply to the extent that these provisions are in conflict with the federal securities laws or rules adopted under those laws. The resolution may amend the articles in their entirety to restate and supersede the original articles and all amendments to them.

Written notice of the shareholders’ meeting setting forth the substance of the proposed amendment must be given to each shareholder entitled to vote in the manner provided in section 10-19.1-73 for the giving of notice of meetings of shareholders.

The proposed amendment to the articles is adopted:

When approved by the affirmative vote of the shareholders required by section 10-19.1-74, except as provided in subdivision b and in subsection 5; or

If the articles provide for a specified proportion or number equal to or larger than the majority necessary to transact a specified type of business at a meeting, or if it is proposed to amend the articles to provide for a specified proportion or number equal to or larger than the majority necessary to transact a specified type of business at a meeting, the affirmative vote necessary to add the provision to, or to amend an existing provision in, the articles is the larger of:

The specified proportion or number or, in the absence of a specific provision, the affirmative vote necessary to transact the type of business described in the proposed amendment at a meeting immediately before the effectiveness of the proposed amendment; or

The specified proportion or number that would, upon effectiveness of the proposed amendment, be necessary to transact the specified type of business at a meeting.

An amendment that merely restates the existing articles, as amended, may be authorized by a resolution approved by the board and may be submitted to and approved by the shareholders as provided in subsections 2, 3, and 4.

Notwithstanding any contrary provision of this chapter, the board of a corporation that is registered as an open-end management investment company under the Investment Company Act of 1940, as amended, may, without shareholder approval, increase or decrease, but not below the then outstanding shares, the aggregate number of shares the corporation has authority to issue, including shares of any class or series, unless a provision has been included in the corporation’s articles prohibiting the board from increasing or decreasing the aggregate number of shares, or any class or series of shares, as applicable, that the corporation has authority to issue.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 147, § 3; 1995, ch. 103, § 9; 2001, ch. 112, § 3; 2003, ch. 85, § 5.

Derivation:

N.D.C.C. 10-19-59.

Cross-References.

Notice of shareholders’ meetings, see N.D.C.C. § 10-19.1-73.

10-19.1-20.
Class or series voting on amendments.

The holders of the outstanding shares of a class or series are entitled to vote as a class or series upon a proposed amendment, whether or not entitled to vote thereon by the provisions of the articles, if the amendment would:

Increase or decrease the par value of the shares of the class or series;

Effect an exchange, reclassification, or cancellation of all or part of the shares of the class or series or effect a combination of outstanding shares of a class or series into a lesser number of shares of the class or series when each other class and series is not subject to a similar combination;

Effect an exchange, or create a right of exchange, of all or any part of the shares of another class or series for the shares of the class or series;

Change the rights or preferences of the shares of the class or series;

Create a new class or series of shares having rights and preferences prior and superior to the shares of that class or series, or increase the rights and preferences or the number of authorized shares, of a class or series having rights and preferences prior or superior to the shares of that class or series;

Divide the shares of the class into series and determine the designation of each series and the variations in the relative rights and preferences between the shares of each series, or authorize the board to do so;

Limit or deny any existing pre-emptive rights of the shares of the class or series; or

Cancel or otherwise affect distributions on the shares of the class or series that have accrued but have not been declared.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 147, § 3; 1995, ch. 103, § 10; 2005, ch. 100, § 6.

Derivation:

N.D.C.C. 10-19-60.

10-19.1-21.
Articles of amendment.

When an amendment has been adopted, articles of amendment must be prepared which contain:

The name of the corporation.

The amendment adopted.

The date of the adoption of the amendment by the shareholders or by the incorporators or the board when no shares have been issued.

If the amendment restates the articles in their entirety, a statement that the restated articles supersede the original articles and all amendments to the original articles.

A statement that the amendment has been adopted pursuant to this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 147, § 3; 1993, ch. 54, § 12; 2005, ch. 100, § 7.

Derivation:

N.D.C.C. 10-19-61, 10-19-64.

10-19.1-22.
Effect of amendment.

An amendment does not affect an existing cause of action in favor of or against the corporation, nor a pending suit to which the corporation is a party, nor the existing rights of persons other than shareholders.

If the corporate name is changed by the amendment, a suit brought by or against the corporation under its former name does not abate for that reason.

When effective under section 10-19.1-24, an amendment restating the articles in their entirety supersedes the original articles and all amendments to the original articles.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 147, § 3; 1993, ch. 54, § 13.

Derivation:

N.D.C.C. 10-19-63.

10-19.1-23.
Filing articles of amendment.

An original of the articles of amendment must be filed with the secretary of state. If the secretary of state finds that the articles of amendment conform to law and all fees have been paid as provided under section 10-19.1-147, the articles of amendment must be recorded in the office of the secretary of state. A corporation that amends the corporate name and is the owner of a service mark, trademark, or trade name, is a general partner named in a fictitious name certificate, or is a general partner in a limited partnership or a limited liability limited partnership, or is a managing partner of a limited liability partnership that is on file with the secretary of state must change or amend the corporation’s name in each registration when the corporation files an amendment.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 147, § 3; 1991, ch. 98, § 12; 1993, ch. 91, § 2; 1999, ch. 50, § 11; 1999, ch. 95, § 10; 2007, ch. 101, § 7; 2009, ch. 106, § 8.

Derivation:

N.D.C.C. 10-19-62.

10-19.1-24.
Effective date of articles of amendment.

The articles of amendment are effective upon acceptance by the secretary of state or at another time within thirty days after acceptance if the articles of amendment so provide.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 147, § 3.

Derivation:

N.D.C.C. 10-19-55, 10-19-63, 10-23-06.

10-19.1-25.
Amendment of articles in court-supervised reorganization.

Whenever a plan of reorganization of a corporation has been confirmed by decree or order of a court of competent jurisdiction in proceedings for the reorganization of the corporation, pursuant to the provisions of any applicable statute of the United States relating to reorganization of corporations, the articles may be amended, in the manner provided in this section, in as many respects as may be necessary to carry out the plan and to put it into effect, so long as the articles as amended contain only provisions which might be lawfully contained in original articles at the time of making the amendment. In particular, and without limitation upon any general power of amendment, the articles may be amended to:

Change the corporate name, period of duration, or corporate purposes of the corporation.

Repeal, alter, or amend the bylaws of the corporation.

Change the aggregate number of shares, or shares of any class, which the corporation has the authority to issue.

Change the preferences, limitations, relative rights in respect of all or any part of the shares of the corporation, and classify, reclassify, or cancel all or any part thereof, whether issued or unissued.

Authorize the issuance of bonds, debentures, or other obligations of the corporation, whether convertible into shares of any class or bearing warrants or other evidences of optional rights to purchase or subscribe for shares of any class, and fix the terms and conditions thereof.

Constitute or reconstitute and classify or reclassify a board and appoint directors and officers in place of or in addition to all or any of the directors or officers then in office.

Amendments to the articles pursuant to subsection 1 must be made in the following manner:

Articles of amendment approved by decree or order of the court must be executed and verified by the person or persons designated or appointed by the court for that purpose and must set forth the name of the corporation, the amendments of the articles approved by the court, the date of the decree or order approving the articles of amendment, and the title of the proceedings in which the decree or order was entered by a court having jurisdiction of the proceedings for the reorganization of the corporation under the provisions of an applicable statute of the United States.

An original of the articles of amendment must be filed with the secretary of state. If the secretary of state finds that the articles of amendment conform to law and that all fees have been paid as provided in section 10-19.1-147, the original must be recorded in the office of the secretary of state.

The articles of amendment become effective upon their acceptance by the secretary of state or at another time within thirty days after acceptance if the articles of amendment so provide.

The articles are amended accordingly with the same effect as if the amendment had been adopted by unanimous action of the directors and shareholders.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 147, § 3; 1991, ch. 98, § 13; 1997, ch. 103, § 8.

Derivation:

N.D.C.C. 10-19-65, 10-19-66.